Illinois, session 104th, SB2907.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Section 8-11-2.5 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/8-11-2.5)7    Sec. 8-11-2.5. Municipal tax review; requests for 8information.9    (a) If a municipality has imposed a tax under Section 108-11-2, then the municipality, which may act through its 11designated auditor or agent, may conduct an audit of tax 12receipts collected from the public utility that is subject to 13the tax or that collects the tax from purchasers on behalf of 14the municipality to determine whether the amount of tax that 15was paid by the public utility was accurate. 16    (b) Not more than once every 2 years, a municipality that 17has imposed a tax under Section 8-11-2 of this Code may, 18subject to the limitations and protections stated in the Local 19Government Taxpayers' Bill of Rights Act, make a written 20request via e-mail to an e-mail address provided by the 21utility for any information from a utility in the format 22maintained by the public utility in the ordinary course of its 23business that the municipality reasonably requires in order to   SB2907- 2 -LRB104 16380 AAS 29768 b1perform an audit under subsection (a). The information that 2may be requested by the municipality includes, without 3limitation:4        (1) in an electronic format used by the public utility 5    in the ordinary course of its business, the 6    premises-specific and other information used by the public 7    utility to determine the amount of tax due to the 8    municipality, for a time period that includes the year in 9    which the request is made and not more than 6 years 10    immediately preceding that year, as appropriate for the 11    period being audited, and which shall include for each 12    customer premises in the municipality: (i) the premises 13    address and zip code; (ii) the classification of the 14    premises as designated by the public utility, such as 15    residential, commercial, or industrial; (iii) monthly 16    usage information sufficient to calculate taxes due, in 17    therms, kilowatts, minutes, or other such other unit of 18    measurement used to calculate the taxes; (iv) the taxes 19    actually assessed, collected, and remitted to the 20    municipality; (v) the first date of service for the 21    premises, if that date occurred within the period being 22    audited; and (vi) any tax exemption claimed for the 23    premises and any additional information that supports a 24    specific tax exemption, if the municipality requests that 25    information, including the customer name and other 26    relevant data; none of the information specified in items   SB2907- 3 -LRB104 16380 AAS 29768 b1    (i) through (vi) of this paragraph (1) shall be deemed 2    customer-specific information. A however, a public utility 3    that is an electric utility may not provide other 4    customer-specific information to the municipality; and5        (2) the premises address for customer accounts that 6    the public utility's records indicate are: (i) in a 7    bordering municipality, township, or unincorporated area 8    (other than the City of Chicago), provided that the 9    municipality provides the public utility a list of such 10    bordering jurisdictions; or (ii) in any zip code with 11    boundaries that include or are adjacent to the requesting 12    municipality provided that the municipality provides the 13    public utility a list of those zip codes; this item (ii) 14    applies to requests made on or after September 1, 2022. If 15    any such customer is determined by the municipality and 16    the utility to be located within the requesting 17    municipality, then the public utility shall provide the 18    additional information provided in paragraph (1) of this 19    subsection (b); and .20        (3) other customer-specific information requested by 21    the municipality. 22    Following the municipality's receipt of the information 23provided by the public utility pursuant to paragraphs (1) or 24(2) of this subsection (b), if a question or issue arises that 25can only be addressed by accessing customer-specific or 26additional information not described in this Section, then the   SB2907- 4 -LRB104 16380 AAS 29768 b1utility shall attempt to resolve the question or issue without 2disclosing any customer-specific information. 3    (c) Each public utility must provide the information 4requested under subsection (b) within 45 days after the date 5of the request.6    The time in which a public utility must provide the 7information requested under subsection (b) may be extended by 8an agreement between the municipality and the public utility.9    (d) If an audit by the municipality or its agents finds an 10error by the public utility in the amount of taxes paid by the 11public utility, then the municipality must notify the public 12utility of the error. Any such notice must be issued pursuant 13to Section 30 of the Local Government Taxpayers' Bill of 14Rights Act or a lesser period of time from the date the tax was 15due that may be specified in the municipal ordinance imposing 16the tax. Upon such a notice, any audit shall be conducted 17pursuant to Section 35 of the Local Government Taxpayers' Bill 18of Rights Act subject to the timelines set forth in this 19subsection (d). The public utility must submit a written 20response within 60 days after the date the notice was 21postmarked stating that it has corrected the error or stating 22the reason that the error is inapplicable or inaccurate. The 23municipality then has 60 days after the receipt of the public 24utility's response to review and contest the conclusion of the 25public utility. If the parties are unable to agree on the 26disposition of the audit findings within 120 days after the   SB2907- 5 -LRB104 16380 AAS 29768 b1notification of the error to the public utility, then either 2party may submit the matter for appeal as outlined in Section 340 of the Local Government Taxpayers' Bill of Rights Act. If 4the appeals process does not produce a satisfactory result, 5then either party may pursue the alleged error in a court of 6competent jurisdiction.7    (e) The public utility shall be liable to the municipality 8for unpaid taxes, including taxes that the public utility 9failed to properly bill to the customer subject to paragraph 10(2) of subsection (e-10) of this Section. This subsection (e) 11does not limit a utility's right to an offsetting credit it 12would otherwise be entitled to, including that authorized by 13subsection (c) of Section 8-11-2 of this Code. To the extent 14that a public utility's errors in past tax collections and 15payments relate to premises located in an area of the 16municipality that was annexed on or after March 17, 2023 (the 17effective date of Public Act 102-1144), however, the public 18utility shall only be liable for such errors beginning 60 days 19after the date that the municipality provided the public 20utility notice of the annexation, provided that the public 21utility provides municipalities with an email address to send 22annexation notices. A copy of the annexation ordinance and the 23map filed with the County Clerk sent to the email address 24provided by the public utility shall be deemed sufficient 25notice, but other forms of notice may also be sufficient.26    (e-5) Upon mutual agreement, a utility and municipality   SB2907- 6 -LRB104 16380 AAS 29768 b1may use a web portal in lieu of email to receive notice of 2annexations and boundary changes. After December 31, 2025 for 3a gas public utility that serves more than 2,000,000 customers 4in Illinois and after December 31, 2022 for all other public 5utilities that serve more than 1,000,000 retail customers in 6Illinois, the public utilities shall provide a secure web 7portal for municipalities to use, and, thereafter, the web 8portals shall be used by all municipalities to notify the 9public utilities of annexations. The web portal must provide 10the municipality with an electronic record of all 11communications and attached documents that the municipality 12has submitted through the portal.13    (e-10) (1) No later than August 1, 2023, the Department of 14Revenue shall develop and publish a written process to be used 15by each public utility and each municipality that imposes a 16tax under Section 8-11-2 of this Code, which may act through 17its designated auditor or agent, under which:18        (A) by December 31, 2024, and on a regular schedule 19    thereafter to occur approximately every 5 years, each 20    public utility shall work collaboratively with each 21    municipality to develop and file with the Department of 22    Revenue, a master list of all premises addresses in the 23    municipality (including premises addresses with inactive 24    accounts) that are subject to such tax and all accounts in 25    the municipality that are exempt from such tax, provided 26    that the final date for the first master list shall be   SB2907- 7 -LRB104 16380 AAS 29768 b1    extended, at the utility's request, to no later than 2    December 31, 2026;3        (B) information is provided to the municipality to 4    facilitate development of the master list including 5    information described in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) 6    of this Section regarding all accounts (including premises 7    addresses with inactive accounts) that the public 8    utility's records show are in the municipality and the 9    premises addresses in (i) any bordering municipality, (ii) 10    any bordering township, or (iii) any zip code that is in 11    any part in the municipality or that borders the 12    municipality;13        (C) any dispute between the public utility and the 14    municipality related to the master list will be resolved;15        (D) on a semi-annual basis following the development 16    of the master list, each public utility shall provide to 17    each municipality certain information that the 18    municipality can use to nominate changes to the master 19    list, including, but not limited to: (i) a list of any 20    tax-related changes, such as the addition or removal of an 21    exemption, or to the taxing jurisdiction, to any account 22    on the master list; and (ii) new premises addresses within 23    the municipality, any bordering municipality, in any 24    bordering township, or in any zip code that is in any part 25    in the municipality or that borders the municipality;26        (E) accounts nominated by the municipality to be added   SB2907- 8 -LRB104 16380 AAS 29768 b1    or deleted from the master list may be submitted to the 2    public utility and related disputes will be resolved;3        (F) changes may be made to the master list; and4        (G) the utility may file a master list based solely on 5    its records if the municipality fails to participate and 6    such a municipality may request to restart the process 7    prior to the end of the 5-year cycle.8    (2) No public utility is liable for any error in tax 9collections or payments due more than 60 days after the date 10that the first master list for the relevant municipality is 11filed with the Department of Revenue unless such error in tax 12collection or payment:13        (A) was related to a premises address on the master 14    list at the time of the error;15        (B) was related to an area of the municipality annexed 16    on or after March 17, 2023 (the effective date of Public 17    Act 102-1144), notice of which was properly provided to 18    the public utility pursuant to the procedures set forth in 19    subsection (e); or20        (C) resulted from the public utility's failure to 21    comply with the process established in this subsection 22    (e-10).23    (3) If the public utility uses a portal as set forth in 24subsection (e-5), all lists, changes affecting tax collection 25and remission, proposed corrections, and reports shall be 26provided through such portal.  SB2907- 9 -LRB104 16380 AAS 29768 b1    (e-15) If a customer paid a tax to a municipality that the 2customer did not owe or was in excess of the tax the customer 3owed, then the customer may, to the extent allowed by Section 49-252 of the Public Utilities Act, recover the tax or over 5payment from the public utility, and any amount so paid by the 6public utility may be deducted by that public utility from any 7taxes then or thereafter owed by the public utility to that 8municipality. 9    (e-20) (1) Any court of competent jurisdiction shall have 10the authority to resolve a claim by a municipality that a 11public utility materially failed to comply with the 12requirements of subsections (b) or (c) of this Section If a 13court finds, after notice and hearing, that a public utility 14(i) caused a material delay in providing information properly 15requested under such subsections or (ii) omitted a material 16portion of information properly requested, then, if the claim 17relates to subsections (b) or (c), the court shall assess a 18penalty on the utility of up to $50,000 per audit, or up to 19$10,000 per audit for a utility that served less than 100,000 20retail customers on the date of the audit notice, or, if the 21claim relates to subsection (e-10), up to $50,000 per 5-year 22master list cycle or up to $10,000 per cycle for a utility that 23served less than 100,000 retail customers on the date such 24master list was filed with the Department, which penalty shall 25be paid by the public utility to the municipality. 26Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, a penalty assessed   SB2907- 10 -LRB104 16380 AAS 29768 b1pursuant to this subsection shall be the exclusive remedy for 2the conduct that is the subject of the claim. A penalty 3assessed under this subsection shall bar and prohibit pursuit 4of any other penalty, fine, or recovery related to the conduct 5for which the penalty was assessed.6    (2) No penalty shall be assessed by the Department 7pursuant to this subsection if the Department finds that a 8delay or omission was immaterial or de minimis.9    (3) Any penalties or fines paid by a public utility 10pursuant to this subsection shall not be recoverable through 11the utility's rates.12    (4) (Blank).13    (f) All account-specific, and premises-specific, and 14customer-specific information provided by a public utility 15under this Section may be used only for the purpose of an audit 16of taxes conducted under this Section and the enforcement of 17any related tax claim. All such information must be held in 18strict confidence by the municipality and its agents and may 19not be disclosed to the public under the Freedom of 20Information Act or under any other similar statutes allowing 21for or requiring public disclosure.22    (g) The provisions of this Section shall not be construed 23as diminishing or replacing any civil remedy available to a 24municipality, taxpayer, or tax collector.25    (h) This Section does not apply to any municipality having 26a population greater than 1,000,000.   SB2907- 11 -LRB104 16380 AAS 29768 b1    (i) The changes to subsection (e) and paragraph (2) of 2subsection (e-10) of this Section made by Public Act 102-1144 3apply to taxes due on or after August 1, 2022. The remaining 4changes to this Section made by Public Act 102-1144 apply on or 5after March 17, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 6102-1144). 7    (j) As used in this Section:8    "Customer-specific information" means the name, phone 9number, email address, and banking information of a customer. 10"Customer-specific information" includes the load-shape data 11associated with a customer account. "Customer-specific 12information" does not include the tax-exempt status of the 13premises and the name of tax-exempt customers.14    "Premises-specific information" means any information, 15including billing and usage data, associated with a premises 16address that is not customer-specific information.17    "Premises address" includes the jurisdiction to which the 18address is currently coded by the public utility for municipal 19tax purposes. 20(Source: P.A. 102-1144, eff. 3-17-23; 103-9, eff. 6-7-23.)